North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-25.1 Child Abuse and Neglect
50-25.1-04.3.
Child fatality review panel — Duties.

The child fatality review panel shall meet at least quarterly to review the deaths and near deaths of all minors which occurred in the state during the preceding twelve months and to identify trends or patterns in the deaths and near deaths of minors. The panel may review near deaths alleged to have resulted only from child abuse and neglect. The panel shall promote:

Interagency communication for the management of child death cases and for the management of future nonfatal cases.

Effective criminal, civil, and social intervention for families with fatalities.

Intervention and counseling of surviving and at-risk siblings, and offer the same.

Interagency use of cases to audit the total health and social service systems and to minimize misclassification of cause of death.

Evaluation of the impact of specific risk factors including substance abuse, domestic violence, and prior child abuse.

Interagency services to high-risk families.

Data collection for surveillance of deaths and the study of categories of causes of death.

The use of media to educate the public about child abuse prevention.

Intercounty, interhuman service zones, and interstate communications regarding child death.

Information that apprises a parent or guardian of the parent’s or guardian’s rights and the procedures taken after the death of a child.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 116, § 9; 2013, ch. 383, § 2; 2019, ch. 391, § 125, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 377, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 383, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

50-25.1-04.4.
Child fatality review panel — Access to records.

Upon the request of a coroner or the presiding officer of a child fatality review panel, any hospital, physician, medical professional, medical facility, mental health professional, mental health facility, school counselor, or division of juvenile services employee shall disclose all records of that entity with respect to any child who has or is eligible to receive a certificate of live birth and who has died. The person submitting the request shall reimburse the disclosing entity for the actual costs of assembling and disclosing the information.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 116, § 9; 2007, ch. 431, § 4.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 431, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

50-25.1-04.5.
Child fatality review panel — Confidentiality of meetings, documentation, and reports.

Notwithstanding section 44-04-19, all meetings of the panel are closed to the public. Notwithstanding section 44-04-18, all documentation and reports of the panel are confidential, except for annual reports. The annual report involving child abuse and neglect deaths and near deaths must include the following:

The cause of and circumstances regarding the death or near death;

The age and gender of the child;

Information describing any previous child abuse and neglect reports or assessments that pertain to the child abuse or neglect that led to the death or near death;

The result of any such assessments; and

The services provided in accordance with section 50-25.1-06, unless disclosure is otherwise prohibited by law.

The panel shall make available to the persons designated in section 50-25.1-11 the documentation and reports of the panel.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 116, § 9; 2013, ch. 383, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 383, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

50-25.1-05.
Child protection assessment — Alternative response assessment — Family services assessment.

The department or authorized agent, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, immediately shall initiate a child protection assessment, alternative response assessment, or family services assessment or cause an assessment, of any report of child abuse or neglect including, when appropriate, the child protection assessment, alternative response assessment, or family services assessment of the home or the residence of the child, any school or child care facility attended by the child, and the circumstances surrounding the report of abuse or neglect.

According to guidelines developed by the department, the department or authorized agent may initiate an alternative response assessment or family services assessment if the department or authorized agent determines initiation is appropriate.

If the report alleges a violation of a criminal statute involving sexual or physical abuse, the department or authorized agent shall initiate a child protection assessment by contacting the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the alleged criminal violation. The department or authorized agent and an appropriate law enforcement agency shall coordinate the planning and execution of the child protection assessment and law enforcement investigation efforts to avoid a duplication of factfinding efforts and multiple interviews. If the law enforcement agency declines to investigate, the department or authorized agent shall continue the child protection assessment to a determination.

The department, the authorized agent, or the law enforcement agency may:

Refer the case to a children’s advocacy center for a forensic interview, forensic medical examination, and other services.

Interview, without the consent of a person responsible for the child’s welfare, the alleged abused or neglected child and any other child who currently resides or who has resided with the person responsible for the child’s welfare or the alleged perpetrator.

Conduct the interview at a school, child care facility, or any other place where the alleged abused or neglected child or other child is found.

Except as prohibited under title 42, Code of Federal Regulations, part 2, a medical, dental, or mental health professional, hospital, medical or mental health facility, or health care clinic shall disclose to the department or the authorized agent, upon request, the records of a patient or client which are relevant to a child protection assessment of reported child abuse or neglect or to a confirmed decision. The department, or the authorized agent, shall limit the request for records to the minimum amount of records necessary to enable a determination to be made or to support a determination of whether child abuse or neglect is confirmed, confirmed with unknown subject, or unable to determine to provide for the protection and treatment of an abused or neglected child.

The department shall adopt guidelines for case referrals to a children’s advocacy center. When cases are referred to a children’s advocacy center, all interviews of the alleged abused or neglected child conducted at the children’s advocacy center under this section must be audio-recorded or video-recorded.

The department or authorized agent shall complete an evidence-based screening tool during a child protection assessment or a family services assessment.

The department or authorized agent may terminate in process a child protection assessment upon a determination there is no credible evidence supporting the reported abuse or neglect occurred.

If a report alleges institutional child abuse or neglect involving a public or private school, the department or the department’s authorized agent shall conduct a child protection assessment. If practical, the department or the department’s authorized agent shall provide notice of the onset of a child protection assessment to the public or private school. A public or private school may complete an investigation into any conduct reported or alleged to constitute institutional child abuse or neglect at the school’s institution concurrently with a child protection assessment. If a public or private school conducts an investigation concurrently with a child protection assessment, the department or the department’s authorized agent and the public or private school shall coordinate the planning and execution of the child protection assessment and public or private school investigation efforts to avoid a duplication of fact finding efforts and multiple interviews if practical.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 5; 1979, ch. 514, § 8; 1985, ch. 536, § 6; 1987, ch. 570, § 38; 1987, ch. 583, § 6; 1989, ch. 585, § 5; 1989, ch. 586, § 1; 1995, ch. 472, § 3; 2005, ch. 434, § 2; 2007, ch. 431, § 5; 2009, ch. 12, § 22; 2017, ch. 343, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 345, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 416, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 22 of chapter 12, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 431, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 50-25.1-05 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 345, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2116; and Section 2 of Chapter 343, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2251.

50-25.1-05.1.
Child abuse or neglect assessment decision — How determined.

Upon completion of the child protection assessment of the initial report of child abuse or neglect, a decision must be made whether confirmed, confirmed with unknown subject, unconfirmed, or unable to determine abuse or neglect of a child.

This determination is the responsibility of the department.

A decision of confirmed may not be made if the suspected child abuse or neglect arises solely out of conduct involving the lawful practice of religious beliefs by a parent or guardian. This exception does not preclude a court from ordering that medical services be provided to the child if the child’s life or safety requires such an order or the child is subject to harm or threatened harm.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 514, § 2; 1987, ch. 583, § 7; 1993, ch. 488, § 1; 1995, ch. 472, § 5; 2019, ch. 416, § 4, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 9, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-05.2.
Report to the court — Entry of report in the child abuse information index.

Upon confirmation that a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child, the department promptly shall make a written report of the decision to the juvenile court having jurisdiction in the matter.

The department promptly shall file a report of a decision that a child meets the definition of an abused or neglected child under this section in the child abuse information index.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 514, § 3; 1987, ch. 570, § 39; 1987, ch. 583, § 8; 1991, ch. 511, § 5; 1995, ch. 472, § 6; 2021, ch. 377, § 10, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-05.3.
Disposition of reports implicating a person not responsible for the child’s health or welfare.

Upon determination by the department or authorized agent that a report made under this chapter implicates a person other than a person responsible for a child’s welfare, the department or authorized agent shall refer the report to an appropriate law enforcement agency for investigation and disposition.

If law enforcement determines a minor committed an act in violation of sections 12.1-20-01 through 12.1-20-04, section 12.1-20-07, sections 12.1-20-11 through 12.1-20-12.2, or chapter 12.1-27.2 against another minor, law enforcement shall provide the report to the department or authorized agent. Law enforcement shall conduct a criminal investigation and shall coordinate with the department or authorized agent for the provision of services to the minors, parents, custodians, or other persons serving in loco parentis with respect to the minors.

The department or authorized agent shall provide risk assessment, safety planning, and any appropriate evidence-based screening for the minors and any other minors under the same care. The department or authorized agent shall refer the minors, parents, custodians, or other persons serving in loco parentis with respect to the minors, for appropriate services.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 537, § 1; 1987, ch. 570, § 40; 1987, ch. 583, § 9; 2019, ch. 256, § 7, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 11, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-05.4.
Department to adopt rules for review of child protection assessment findings.

The department shall adopt rules to resolve complaints and conduct appeal hearings requested by the subject of a report of suspected child abuse, neglect, or death resulting from abuse or neglect who is aggrieved by the confirmed decision.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 587, § 1; 1993, ch. 489, § 1; 1995, ch. 116, § 10; 1995, ch. 472, § 7; 2019, ch. 416, § 5, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 12, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-05.5.
Child abuse information index — Establishment.

The division of children and family services or other division as determined appropriate by the department shall maintain a child abuse information index of all reports confirmed or confirmed with unknown subjects for child abuse, neglect, or death resulting from abuse or neglect which are filed pursuant to section 50-25.1-05.2.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 511, § 6; 1995, ch. 116, § 11; 1995, ch. 472, § 8; 2021, ch. 377, § 13, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-05.6.
Interviews on school property.

The department, authorized agent, or appropriate law enforcement agency shall notify the school principal or other appropriate school administrator of its intent to conduct an interview on school property pursuant to section 50-25.1-05. The school administrator may not disclose the nature of the notification or any other related information concerning the interview to any person, including a person responsible for the child’s welfare. The school administrator and department, authorized agent, or law enforcement agency shall make every effort to reduce the disruption of the educational program of the child, other students, or school staff when an interview is conducted on school property.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 586, § 2; 1995, ch. 472, § 4; 2021, ch. 377, § 14, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-06.
Protective and other services to be provided.

The department shall provide protective services for a child meeting the definition of an abused or neglected child and who is at substantial risk of continued abuse or neglect due to a supported state of impending danger, as well as other children under the same care as may be necessary for their well-being and safety and shall provide other appropriate social services, as the circumstances warrant, to the parents, custodian, or other persons serving in loco parentis with respect to the child or the other children. The department may discharge the duties described in this section through an authorized agent. The department may provide protective services, as resources permit, for any child, other children under the same care, parents, custodian, or other persons serving in loco parentis upon concurrence of the parent, custodian, or other persons serving in loco parentis.

The department shall provide appropriate services to a child referred as a child in need of services and shall provide appropriate services to the person responsible for the child’s welfare and the children under the same care as may be necessary for the well-being and safety of the children.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 6; 1987, ch. 570, § 41; 1987, ch. 583, § 10; 2005, ch. 418, § 15; 2021, ch. 245, § 40, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 377, § 15, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 50-25.1-06 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 15 of Chapter 377, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2083; and Section 40 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035.

Collateral References.

Tort liability of public authority for failure to remove parentally abused or neglected children from parents’ custody, 60 A.L.R.4th 942.

50-25.1-06.1.
Caseload standards — Reimbursement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 538, § 1; 1995, ch. 472, § 9; 2005, ch. 418, § 16; 2017, ch. 343, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 416, § 6, effective August 1, 2019; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 139, effective January 1, 2020.

50-25.1-07.
Protective custody.

Any physician examining a child with respect to whom abuse or neglect is known or suspected, after reasonable attempts to advise the parents, guardian, or other person having responsibility for the care of the child that the physician suspects has been abused or neglected, may keep the child in the custody of the hospital or medical facility for not to exceed ninety-six hours and must immediately notify the juvenile court and the department or authorized agent in order that child protective proceedings may be instituted.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 7; 1987, ch. 570, § 42; 1987, ch. 583, § 11; 2021, ch. 377, § 16, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-08.
Guardian ad litem.

The court, in every case involving an abused or neglected child which results in a judicial proceeding, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child in those proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 8; 1977, ch. 456, § 2; 1979, ch. 364, § 3.

50-25.1-09.
Immunity from liability.

Any person, other than the alleged violator, participating in good faith in the making of a report, assisting in an investigation, assisting or furnishing information in a child protection assessment, assisting or furnishing information in an alternative response assessment, assisting or furnishing information in a family services assessment, or in providing protective services under this chapter or who is a member of the child fatality review panel, is immune from any liability, civil or criminal, except for criminal liability as provided by section 50-25.1-13, that otherwise might result from reporting the alleged case of abuse, neglect, or death resulting from child abuse or neglect. For the purpose of any proceeding, civil or criminal, the good faith of any person required to report cases of child abuse, neglect, or death resulting from abuse or neglect must be presumed.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 9; 1985, ch. 536, § 8; 1995, ch. 116, § 12; 1995, ch. 472, § 10; 2017, ch. 343, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 416, § 7, effective August 1, 2019.

50-25.1-09.1.
Employer retaliation prohibited — Penalty.

An employer that retaliates against an employee solely because the employee in good faith reported having reasonable cause to suspect that a child was abused or neglected, or died as a result of abuse or neglect, or because the employee is a child with respect to whom a report was made, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. It is a defense to any charge brought under this section that the presumption of good faith, described in section 50-25.1-09, has been rebutted.

The employer of an individual required or permitted to report pursuant to section 50-25.1-03 which retaliates against the individual because of a report of abuse or neglect, or a report of a death resulting from child abuse or neglect, is liable to that individual in a civil action for all damages, including exemplary damages, costs of the litigation, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

There is a rebuttable presumption that any adverse action within ninety days of a report is retaliatory. For purposes of this subsection, an “adverse action” is action taken by an employer against the individual making the report or the child with respect to whom a report was made, including:

Discharge, suspension, termination, or transfer from any facility, institution, school, agency, or other place of employment;

Discharge from or termination of employment;

Demotion or reduction in remuneration for services; or

Restriction or prohibition of access to any facility, institution, school, agency, or other place of employment or individuals affiliated with it.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 536, § 3; 1989, ch. 588, § 1; 1995, ch. 116, § 13; 2021, ch. 377, § 17, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-10.
Abrogation of privileged communications.

Any privilege of communication between husband and wife or between any professional person and the person’s patient or client, except between attorney and client, is abrogated and does not constitute grounds for preventing a report to be made or for excluding evidence in any proceeding regarding child abuse, neglect, or death resulting from abuse or neglect resulting from a report made under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 10; 1995, ch. 116, § 14.

50-25.1-11.
Confidentiality of records — Authorized disclosures.

A report made under this chapter, as well as any other information obtained, is confidential and must be made available to:

A physician who has before the physician a child whom the physician reasonably suspects may have been abused or neglected.

A person who is authorized to place a child in protective custody and has before the person a child whom the person reasonably suspects may have been abused or neglected and the person requires the information to determine whether to place the child in protective custody.

Authorized staff of the department and its authorized agents, children’s advocacy centers, and appropriate state child protection team members, and citizen review committee members.

Any person who is the subject of the report; provided, however, that the identity of persons reporting or supplying information under this chapter is protected until the information is needed for use in an administrative proceeding arising out of the report.

Public officials and their authorized agents who require the information in connection with the discharge of their official duties.

A court, including an administrative hearing office, whenever the court determines that the information is necessary for the determination of an issue before the court.

A person engaged in a bona fide research purpose approved by the department’s institutional review board; provided, however, that no individually identifiable information as defined in section 50-06-15 is made available to the researcher unless the information is absolutely essential to the research purpose and the department gives prior approval.

An individual who is identified in subsection 1 of section 50-25.1-03, and who has made a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, if the child is likely to or continues to come before the reporter in the reporter’s official or professional capacity.

A parent or a legally appointed guardian of the child identified in the report as suspected of being, or having been, abused or neglected, provided the identity of persons making the report or supplying information under this chapter is protected. Unless the information is confidential under section 44-04-18.7, when a decision is made under section 50-25.1-05.1 that a child is abused or neglected, the department or authorized agent shall make a good-faith effort to provide written notice of the decision to individuals identified in this subsection. The department or authorized agent shall consider any known domestic violence when providing notification under this section.

A public or private school that is the subject of a report of institutional child abuse or neglect, provided the identity of the persons reporting or supplying the information under this chapter is protected, except if the individuals reporting or supplying information are employees of the public or private school.

In accordance with subsection 3 of section 50-11.1-07.8, the department or authorized agent shall notify the owner, operator, holder of a self-declaration, or in-home provider and shall notify the parent or legally appointed guardian of a child, who at the time of notification is receiving early childhood services under chapter 50-11.1, of the name of the subject and provide a summary of the facts and the results of a child protection assessment conducted under this chapter if the report made under this chapter involves the owner, operator, holder of a self-declaration, or in-home provider; or involves an adult or minor staff member or adult or minor household member of the early childhood program, self-declaration, or in-home provider, who is providing care to the child.

In accordance with subsection 4 of section 50-25.1-04.1, the department may notify the residential facility or setting’s board of directors and any entity that accredits the facility or setting of the institutional child abuse or neglect indicated determination, written report of the state child protection team, the approved improvement plan, and areas of deficiency that resulted in the notification.

If a public or private school is the subject of a report of institutional child abuse or neglect, any records and information obtained, created, generated, or gathered by the public or private school in response to the report or during an investigation by the public or private school of the alleged conduct set forth in the report, are confidential until the state child protection team makes a determination in accordance with section 50-25.1-04.1 whether institutional child abuse or neglect is indicated.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 11; 1979, ch. 514, § 9; 1985, ch. 536, § 9; 1987, ch. 570, § 43; 1987, ch. 583, § 12; 1989, ch. 585, § 6; 2001, ch. 155, § 2; 2005, ch. 418, § 17; 2005, ch. 434, § 3; 2007, ch. 431, § 6; 2009, ch. 434, § 2; 2011, ch. 360, § 2; 2017, ch. 347, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 407, § 4, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 416, § 8, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 377, § 18, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 360, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 434, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 431, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 50-25.1-11 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 407, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2043; and Section 8 of Chapter 416, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1108.

50-25.1-11.1.
Children’s advocacy centers — Confidentiality of records — Criminal history record checks.

Records and digital media in the possession of a children’s advocacy center relating to a forensic medical examination, forensic interview, or therapy are confidential and may be released only to a person other than a law enforcement agency, the department or the department’s authorized agent, or a medical or mental health professional when the child comes before the medical or mental health professional in that person’s professional capacity, upon service of a subpoena signed by a judge.

The department may submit a request for a criminal history record check under section 12-60-24 on an employee, final applicant for employment, contractor, multidisciplinary team member, or volunteer of a children’s advocacy center who has contact with a child at or through a children’s advocacy center.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 344, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 378, § 2, effective March 26, 2021; 2021, ch. 30, § 13, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 50-25.1-11.1 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 13 of Chapter 30, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2002; and Section 2 of Chapter 378, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2131.

50-25.1-12.
Cooperation required.

All law enforcement officials, courts of competent jurisdiction, and appropriate state agencies shall cooperate in fulfillment of the purposes of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 12.

50-25.1-13.
Penalty for failure to report — Penalty and civil liability for false reports.

Any individual required by this chapter to report or to supply information concerning a case of known or suspected child abuse, neglect, or death resulting from abuse or neglect who willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, fails to do so is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. Any individual who willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, makes a false report, or provides false information that causes a report to be made, under this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor unless the false report is made to a law enforcement official, in which case the individual who causes the false report to be made is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. An individual who willfully makes a false report, or willfully provides false information that causes a report to be made, under this chapter is also liable in a civil action for all damages suffered by the person reported, including exemplary damages.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 13; 1985, ch. 536, § 10; 1987, ch 585, § 1; 1989, ch. 585, § 7; 1989, ch. 588, § 2; 1995, ch. 116, § 15; 2021, ch. 377, § 19, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of state statute requiring doctor or other person to report child abuse, 73 A.L.R.4th 782.

50-25.1-14.
Unauthorized disclosure of reports — Penalty.

Any individual who permits or encourages the unauthorized disclosure of reports made or confidential information obtained under the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 448, § 14; 2021, ch. 377, § 20, effective August 1, 2021.

50-25.1-15.
Abandoned infant — Approved location procedure — Reporting immunity. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Abandoned infant” means an infant who has been abandoned at birth at a hospital or before reaching the age of one year regardless of the location of birth and who has been left with an on-duty staff member at an approved location in an unharmed condition.

“Approved location” means a hospital or other location as designated by administrative rule adopted by the department.

“Hospital” means a facility licensed under chapter 23-16.

A parent of an infant under the age of one year, or an agent of the parent with the parent’s consent, may leave the infant with an on-duty staff member at an approved location. Neither the parent nor the agent is subject to prosecution under sections 14-07-15 and 14-09-22 for leaving an abandoned infant.

An approved location shall accept an infant left under this section. The approved location may request information regarding the parents and shall provide the parent or the agent with a medical history form and an envelope with the approved location’s return address. If a hospital accepting the infant has the infant’s medical history, the hospital is not required to provide the parent or the agent with a medical history form. Neither the parent nor the agent is required to provide any information.

If an infant is left at a hospital, the hospital shall provide the parent or the agent with a numbered identification bracelet to link the parent or the agent to the infant, unless due to birth of the infant, the infant and parent currently have an identification bracelet. Possession of an identification bracelet does not entitle the bracelet holder to take custody of the infant on demand. If an individual possesses a bracelet linking the individual to an infant left at a hospital under this section and parental rights have not been terminated, possession of the bracelet creates a presumption that the individual has standing to participate in a protection services action brought under this chapter or chapter 27-20.3. Possession of the bracelet does not create a presumption of maternity, paternity, or custody.

The approved location may provide the parent or the agent with any relevant information, including:

Information about the safe place for abandoned infant programs;

Information about adoption and counseling services; and

Information about whom to contact if reunification is sought.

Within twenty-four hours of receiving an infant under this section, the approved location shall report to the department or authorized agent, as required by section 50-25.1-03, that an infant has been left at the approved location. The report may not be made before the parent or the agent leaves the approved location.

The approved location and its employees and agents are immune from any criminal or civil liability for accepting an infant under this section.

Upon receiving a report of an abandoned infant under this section, the department or authorized agent shall proceed as required under this chapter if it appears that the abandoned infant was not harmed, except the department or authorized agent may not attempt to identify or contact the parent or the agent. If it appears the infant who was left was harmed, the department or authorized agent shall initiate a child protection assessment of the matter as required by law.

If an individual claiming to be the parent or the agent contacts the department or authorized agent and requests to be reunited with the infant who was left, the department or authorized agent may identify or contact the individual as required under this chapter and all other applicable laws. If an individual contacts the department or authorized agent seeking information only, the department or authorized agent may attempt to obtain information regarding the identity and medical history of the parents and may provide information regarding the procedures in a case involving an infant who was left at an approved location. The individual is under no obligation to respond to the request for information, and the department or authorized agent may not attempt to compel response to investigate the identity or background of the individual.

The state department of health, in coordination with the department of human services, shall develop and implement a public awareness campaign to provide information, public service announcements, and educational materials regarding this section to the public, including medical providers, law enforcement, and social service agencies.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 434, § 1; 2019, ch. 416, § 9, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 417, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 245, § 41, § 41, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 377, § 21, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 470, effective September 1, 2022.

Note.

Section 50-25.1-15 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 21 of Chapter 377, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 2083; Section 41 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035; and Section 470 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

Section 50-25.1-15 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 417, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1285; and Section 9 of Chapter 416, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1108.

Collateral References.

Construction and Application of State Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Acts. 70 A.L.R.6th 183.